Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8310
Currently licensed facilities; changes in credentialing; when.

Changes in the credentialing of categories of currently licensed facilities should occur only when:

(1) Credentialing is not needed to ensure the protection of the public health, safety, or welfare or the then current rules and regulations or statutory provisions are not providing adequate protection of the public health, safety, or welfare;

(2) Credentialing has been more detrimental than beneficial to the public health, safety, or welfare by diminishing the supply of qualified providers or the public's access to needed services; or

(3) There are more cost-effective means of protecting the public from harm than credentialing.

Laws 1998, LB 1073, § 116.